Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,251.02
Licensed beverage establishment, defined.

Licensed beverage establishment shall mean an establishment that serves alcoholic beverages and may or may not provide limited food service.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 11.